Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Commission Hearings and Rehearings; Appeal of Order of Commission

§ 77-7-291.
Conduct of commission hearings.

Any matter arising in the administration of this chapter requiring a hearing shall be heard and decided by the commission, or shall, by order of the commission, be referred to a member or employee of the commission for hearing and the recommendation of an appropriate order thereon. With respect to such matters, the member or employee shall have all the rights, duties, powers and jurisdiction conferred by this chapter upon the commission, except that the order recommended by such member or employee shall be subject to the following provisions of this section. Any order recommended by the member or employee with respect to such matter shall be in writing and be accompanied by the reasons therefor, and shall be filed with the commission. Copies of such recommended order shall be served upon the interested parties, who may file exceptions thereto; if no exceptions are filed within twenty (20) days after service upon such persons, or within such further period as the commission may authorize, such recommended order shall become the order of the commission and become effective, unless within such period the order is stayed or postponed by the commission. Where exceptions are filed as herein provided it shall be the duty of the commission to consider the same and, if sufficient reason appears therefor, the commission shall grant such review or make such orders or hold or authorize such further hearings or proceedings in the premises as may be necessary or proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The commission may, on its own motion, review any such matter and take action thereon as if exceptions thereto had been filed. The commission, after review upon the same record or as supplemented by a further hearing, shall decide the matter and make appropriate order thereon.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7678; Laws, 1938, ch. 142.

§ 77-7-293.
Rehearings of orders or decisions of commission.

After an order or decision has been made by the commission, any party to the proceedings may, within thirty (30) days after the entry of the order or decision, apply for a rehearing in respect of any matters determined in such proceedings and specified in the application for rehearing, and the commission may grant and hold such rehearings on such matters.

The commission shall either grant or refuse an application for rehearing within twenty (20) days after the date of application therefor. A failure by the commission to act upon such application within that period shall be deemed refusal thereof. If the application is granted, the commission shall conduct and conclude a rehearing within thirty (30) days of the entry of the order for rehearing and shall enter a new order after the rehearing shall have been concluded. Such new order shall become effective ten (10) days after it is entered, unless otherwise provided by the commission for reasonable cause.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 356, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 77-7-295.
Appeal of final finding, order or judgment of commission.

In addition to other remedies now available, the state, or any party aggrieved by any final finding, order or judgment of the commission, shall have the right, regardless of the amount involved, of appeal to the First Judicial District Circuit Court of Hinds County, Mississippi. If an application for rehearing has been filed, an appeal must be filed within thirty (30) days after the application for rehearing has been refused or deemed refused because of the commission’s failure to act thereon within the time specified in Section 77-7-293, or if the application is granted, within thirty (30) days after the rendition of the decision on rehearing. If an application for rehearing has not been filed, an appeal must be filed within thirty (30) days after the entry of the commission’s order. In those cases wherein an administrative order of the commission is involved, the circuit court may affirm or reverse for further proceedings as justice may require. In those cases wherein the commission’s order appealed from is a judicial finding, the circuit court shall review, affirm, reverse or modify the same and enter therein such order or judgment as may be right and just. Without excluding any other finding, order or judgment of the commission as constituting a judicial finding, the granting or denial by the commission of an application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity, or the granting of denial of an application for a permit to operate as a contract carrier, shall be construed as a judicial finding, and appealable as such. All such appeals shall be taken and perfected, heard and determined either in term time or in vacation, on the record, including a transcript of pleadings and testimony, both oral and documentary, filed and heard before the commission; and such appeal shall be heard and disposed of promptly by the court as a preference cause. In perfecting any appeal provided by this section, the provisions of law respecting notice to the reporter and the allowance of bills of exception, now or hereafter in force respecting appeals from circuit courts to the Supreme Court, shall be applicable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 356, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1992.